Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3808
Mentally ill person; sections not applicable.

No provision of sections 29-3801 to 29-3809 and no remedy made available by sections 29-3801 to 29-3809 shall apply to any person who is adjudged to be mentally ill.

Laws 1984, LB 591, § 8.